Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5171.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The title of Chapter 23-12.10 of the General Laws entitled "Harm Reduction
Center Advisory Committee and Pilot Program." is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 23-12.10
Harm Reduction Center Advisory Committee and Pilot Program. [Expires March 1, 2026.]
CHAPTER 23-12.10
HARM REDUCTION CENTER ADVISORY COMMITTEE AND PROGRAM
SECTION 2. Sections 23-12.10-1 and 23-12.10-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-12.10
entitled "Harm Reduction Center Advisory Committee and Pilot Program." are hereby amended to
read as follows:
23-12.10-1. Purpose and creation — Municipal authorization required.
(a) The purpose of this chapter is to authorize a four-year (4) pilot program to prevent drug
overdoses through the establishment of “harm reduction centers,” which, as used in this chapter,
shall be defined as a community-based resource for health screening, disease prevention, and
recovery assistance where persons may safely consume pre-obtained substances. Smoking of pre-
obtained substances shall also be permitted within the harm reduction center.
(b) Each harm reduction center shall provide the necessary healthcare professionals to
prevent overdose, and shall provide referrals for counseling or other medical treatment that may be
appropriate for persons utilizing the harm reduction center.

(c) The director of the department of health shall promulgate regulations to authorize the
program established by this chapter, and in accordance with § 23-12.10-5. Nothing contained in
this section authorizes a harm reduction center without approval of the municipality in which the
center is proposed.
(d)(1) Any harm reduction center proposed to be operated pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter shall require municipal authorization and approval prior to opening or operating in any
community within this state.
(2) As used in this chapter, the term “municipal authorization and approval” means an
express affirmative vote by the city or town council, or the equivalent governing body, of any
municipality where a harm reduction center is proposed to be located, which affirmative vote
approves:
(i) The opening and operation of the proposed harm reduction center;
(ii) The exact location of the proposed harm reduction center, which shall include street
address and plat and lot number or other applicable number as used by the municipality’s tax
assessor; and
(iii) An express authorization as to the hours of operation of the proposed harm reduction
center.
(e) Each harm reduction center approved for operation pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter shall cease operations on or before March 1, 2026 2028, unless an act of the general
assembly expressly authorizes the continuation of the operation of the harm reduction center.
23-12.10-6. Sunset.
On or before January 31, 2026 2028, the director of the department of health and the
attorney general shall submit to the governor, the speaker of the house, and the president of the
senate, a report which includes, at a minimum, the number of individuals served by each harm
reduction center; the number of individuals who were connected to health services by each harm
reduction center; and any data relating to the occurrence of and/or prevention of overdoses or deaths
associated with each harm reduction center, as well as recommendations as to continuation of the
provisions of this chapter. Unless , and unless extended by the general assembly, the provisions of
this chapter shall sunset and expire on March 1, 2026 2028.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000790/SUB A
========
LC000790/SUB A - Page 2 of 3